Maryland, session 2026, HB1517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Land Use
1–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1517*

HOUSE BILL 1517
(i) “Local jurisdiction” means a county or municipal corporation and the territory
within which its powers may be exercised.
7–505.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “QUALIFIED PROJECT” MEANS A RESIDENTIAL PROJECT THAT:
(I) CONSISTS OF NEW CONSTRUCTION OR SUBSTANTIAL
RENOVATION;
(II) HAS BEEN TARGETED BY RETALIATORY DOWNZONING;
(III) OTHERWISE QUALIFIES AS A QUALIFIED PROJECT UNDER §
7–502, § 7–503, OR § 7–504 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(IV) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEM (V) OF THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. CONTAINS AT LEAST 15% OF UNITS THAT ARE
AFFORDABLE DWELLING UNITS; AND
2. IS DEED–RESTRICTED TO INCLUDE 15% OF UNITS
THAT ARE AFFORDABLE DWELLING UNITS FOR A PERIOD OF AT LEAST 40 YEARS;
AND
(V) IN A LOCAL JURISDICTION THAT, ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER
31, 2024, HAS REQUIREMENTS EQUAL TO OR EXCEEDING THE REQUIREMENTS
UNDER ITEM (IV) OF THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. CONTAINS AT LEAST 20% OF UNITS THAT ARE
AFFORDABLE DWELLING UNITS; AND
2. IS DEED–RESTRICTED TO INCLUDE 20% OF UNITS
THAT ARE AFFORDABLE DWELLING UNITS FOR A PERIOD OF AT LEAST 40 YEARS.
(3) “RETALIATORY DOWNZONING” MEANS THE REZONING OF A
PROJECT OR PROPERTY TO REDUCE THE OTHERWISE PERMITTED RESIDENTIAL
DENSITY WHERE A LOCAL OFFICIAL:
(I) IDENTIFIES THE PROJECT OR PROPERTY BY NAME,
ADDRESS, OR MATERIAL DESCRIPTION IN ANY PUBLIC OR CONSTITUENT
COMMUNICATION;

HOUSE BILL 1517 3
(II) PUBLICLY STATES OR COMMUNICATES OPPOSITION OR
CONCERN IN ANY FORUM, INCLUDING CONSTITUENT E–MAILS, COMMUNITY
MEETINGS, OR MEDIA INTERVIEWS;
(III) ENACTS, SPONSORS, OR CAUSES TO BE ENACTED OR
SPONSORED A ZONING DESIGNATION CHANGE THAT REDUCES THE PERMITTED
RESIDENTIAL DENSITY OF THE PROPERTY WHEN THE MAJORITY OF THE PROPERTY
HAS BEEN ZONED UNDER THE SAME DESIGNATION FOR NOT LESS THAN 25
CONSECUTIVE YEARS; AND
(IV) WITHIN 4 YEARS AFTER PUBLICLY OPPOSING THE PROJECT
OR PROPERTY, TAKES LEGISLATIVE OR ADMINISTRATIVE ACTIONS THAT
MATERIALLY DELAY, OBSTRUCT, OR BURDEN REDEVELOPMENT OF THE PROPERTY
AND ARE DONE IN A MANNER INCONSISTENT WITH OR CONTRARY TO THE WRITTEN
RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE LOCAL PLANNING, TRANSPORTATION, OR PUBLIC
WORKS DEPARTMENTS.
(B) (1) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION, A LOCAL JURISDICTION
SHALL ALLOW THE DENSITY OF A QUALIFIED PROJECT TO EXCEED THE DENSITY
OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED IN A DISTRICT OR ZONE.
(2) IN AN AREA ZONED FOR SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENTIAL USE, A
QUALIFIED PROJECT MAY INCLUDE MIDDLE HOUSING UNITS.
(3) IN AN AREA ZONED FOR MULTIFAMILY RESIDENTIAL USE, A
QUALIFIED PROJECT:
(I) SHALL HAVE A DENSITY THAT IS THE GREATER OF:
1. A LIMIT THAT EXCEEDS BY 60% THE ALLOWABLE
DENSITY IN THAT ZONE FOR USES THAT ARE NOT PART OF A QUALIFIED PROJECT;
OR
2. 50% OF THE DENSITY ALLOWED UNDER THE
PREVIOUS ZONING; AND
(II) MAY CONSIST OF MIXED–USE.
(4) SUBJECT TO § 7–509 OF THIS SUBTITLE, IN AN AREA ZONED FOR
NONRESIDENTIAL USE, A QUALIFIED PROJECT MAY CONSIST OF MIXED–USE
DEVELOPMENT WITH DENSITY LIMITS THAT DO NOT EXCEED THE HIGHEST
ALLOWABLE DENSITY IN THE LOCAL JURISDICTION’S MULTIFAMILY RESIDENTIAL

HOUSE BILL 1517
ZONES.
(5) IN AN AREA ZONED FOR MIXED–USE, A QUALIFIED PROJECT MAY
INCLUDE 60% MORE HOUSING UNITS THAN ARE ALLOWED IN THAT ZONE FOR USES
THAT ARE NOT PART OF A QUALIFIED PROJECT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.